Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4859.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Educational institution" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.2. (b) "Immigration enforcement action" means any of the following actions taken by a law enforcement officer for the purpose of immigration enforcement or to obtain information in regards to an individual's immigration or citizenship status: (i) Arresting or interviewing an individual. (ii) Conducting a search or surveillance. (c) "Place of worship" means a church, synagogue, mosque, or other institution of worship, including, but not limited to, a building rented for a religious service. (d) "Sensitive location" means all of the following: (i) An educational institution. (ii) A place of worship. (iii) A hospital. (iv) The site of a funeral, wedding, or other public religious ceremony. (v) A courthouse. (vi) The site of an organization that is assisting children, pregnant women, victims of crime or abuse, or an individual with significant mental or physical disabilities. Sec. 2. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a law enforcement officer may not conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location. (2) A law enforcement officer may conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location if a court order directs the law enforcement officer conducting the immigration enforcement action to enter the sensitive location. (3) A law enforcement officer may conduct an immigration enforcement action in a sensitive location if the immigration enforcement action is necessary to address a threat that poses imminent danger to public safety.